Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.5 Community Disaster Loans in Major Disasters

30-15.5-1.
Authority of governor.

Whenever the governor has declared a disaster emergency to exist under the laws of this state, or the president of the United States, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state, the governor is authorized:

Upon the determination by the governor that a local government of the state will suffer a substantial loss of tax and other revenues from a major disaster and has demonstrated a need for financial assistance to perform its governmental functions, to apply to the federal government, on behalf of the local government, for a loan, and to receive and disburse the proceeds of any approved loan to any applicant local government;

To determine the amount needed by any applicant local government to restore or resume its governmental functions and to certify that amount to the federal government; provided, however, that no application amount shall exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the annual operating budget of the applicant for the fiscal year in which the major disaster occurs; and

To recommend to the federal government, based upon the governor’s review, the cancellation of all or any part of repayment when, in the first three (3), full fiscal-year period following the major disaster, the revenues of the local government are insufficient to meet its operating expenses, including additional disaster related expenses of a municipal operation character.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 159, § 1.